Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2626.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; COMMUNITY SOLUTIONS FOR HEALTHY CHILD DEVELOPMENT GRANTS.new text end new text begin $5,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $5,000,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of health for distribution for community solutions for healthy child development grants under Minnesota Statutes, section 145.9285. new text end